Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 2
DEGREES - HONORARY - ACADEMIC
ACHIEVEMENT

Section

23-2-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly declares that this article is enacted for the general improvement of the educational programs available to the residents of the state of Colorado; to establish high standards for the education of such residents; to prevent misrepresentation, fraud, and collusion in offering such educational programs to the public; to eliminate those practices relative to such programs which are incompatible with the public interest; and to protect, preserve, foster, and encourage the educational programs offered by private educational institutions which meet generally recognized criteria of quality and effectiveness as determined through voluntary accreditation. To these ends, this article shall be liberally construed.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 1042, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-21-1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1084, § 1, effective May 27.

23-2-102. Definitions.

As used in this article 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Alternate enrollment" means the opportunity for a student enrolled in a private college or university that ceases operation to meet the student's educational objectives through education provided by another authorized private college or university, a community college, an area technical college, or any other educational arrangement acceptable to the department and the commission.

"Authorization" means the authorization granted to a private college or university or seminary or religious training institution by the commission as provided in this article and the policies adopted pursuant to this article. Authorization is not an endorsement of the institution by either the commission or the department.

"Commission" means the Colorado commission on higher education created pursuant to section 23-1-102.

"Degree" means a statement, diploma, certificate, or other writing in any language that indicates or represents, or that is intended to indicate or represent, that the person named thereon is learned in or has satisfactorily completed a prescribed course of study in a particular field of endeavor or that the person named thereon has demonstrated proficiency in a field of endeavor as a result of formal preparation or training.

"Department" means the department of higher education created and existing pursuant to section 24-1-114, C.R.S.

"Enrollment agreement" means the contract prepared by a private college or university or seminary or religious training institution that a student signs to indicate agreement to the terms of admission, delivery of instruction, and monetary terms as outlined in the institution's student handbook or catalog.

"Governing board" means the elected or appointed group of persons that oversees and controls a private college or university or a seminary or religious training institution.

"Honorary degree" means a statement, diploma, certificate, or other writing in any language that indicates or represents, or that is intended to indicate or represent, that the person named thereon is learned in a field of public service or has performed outstanding public service or that the person named thereon has demonstrated proficiency in a field of endeavor without having completed formal courses of instruction or study or formal preparation or training.

"Out-of-state public institution" means an institution of higher education that is established by statute in a state other than Colorado.

"Owner" means:

An individual, if a private for-profit college or university is structured as a sole proprietorship;

Partners, if a private for-profit college or university is structured as a partnership;

Members in a limited liability company, if a private for-profit college or university is structured as a limited liability company; or

Shareholders in a corporation that hold a controlling interest, if a private for-profit college or university is structured as a corporation.

"Private college or university" means a postsecondary educational institution doing business or maintaining a place of business in the state of Colorado, which institution enrolls the majority of its students in a baccalaureate or postgraduate degree program.

"Private nonprofit college or university" means a private college or university that maintains tax-exempt status pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec. 501 (c)(3).

"Private occupational school" means an institution authorized by the private occupational school division under the provisions of article 64 of this title 23.

"Seminary" or "religious training institution" means a bona fide religious postsecondary educational institution that is operating or maintaining a place of business in the state of Colorado, that is exempt from property taxation under the laws of this state, and that offers baccalaureate, master's, or doctoral degrees or diplomas.

"State college or university" means a postsecondary educational institution, including a community or local district college, established and existing pursuant to law as an agency of the state of Colorado and supported wholly or in part by tax revenues.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 1042, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-21-2.

L. 78:

(5) amended, p. 375, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(3) to (5) amended and (3.5) added, p. 1084, § 2, effective May 27.

L. 90:

(3.5) amended, p. 1172, § 31, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1), (3), and (4) amended and (1.3) and (1.5) added, p. 1646, § 1, effective May 29.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1155), ch. 255, p. 1282, § 9, effective August 8.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (HB 16-1082), ch. 58, p. 143, § 13, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

IP and (13) amended, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1204, § 9, effective August 9.

23-2-102.5. Applicability of article.

A private college or university that enrolls a majority of its students at the certificate or associate level is regulated by the private occupational school division and the private occupational school board pursuant to article 64 of this title 23 and is not subject to the provisions of this article 2.

If, as a result of changes in student enrollment, a private college or university at times meets the definition provided in section 23-2-102 (11) and should therefore be regulated by the department and the commission, and at other times meets the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) and should therefore be regulated by the private occupational school division and the private occupational school board, the private college or university is subject to regulation by the entity that is appropriate as of July 1, 2012, if the private college or university is authorized as of said date, or as of the date the institution applies for authorization, and the institution shall be regulated by the same entity for the following three years. The department shall review the status of the private college or university every three years after July 1, 2012, or every three years after initial authorization, whichever is appropriate, to determine whether the institution should be subject to regulation by the department and the commission or by the private occupational school division and the private occupational school board.

An out-of-state public institution may request authorization pursuant to the provisions of this article from the department and the commission. In seeking and maintaining authorization pursuant to this article, an out-of-state public institution is subject to the same criteria and requirements that apply to a private college or university.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (HB 12-1155), ch. 255, p. 1283, § 10, effective August 8.

L. 2017:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1205, § 10, effective August 9.

23-2-103. Awarding degrees.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 7-50-105 or any other law to the contrary, a person, partnership, corporation, company, society, or association doing business in the state of Colorado shall not award, bestow, confer, give, grant, convey, or sell to any other person a degree or honorary degree upon which is inscribed, in any language, the word "associate", "bachelor", "baccalaureate", "master", or "doctor", or any abbreviation thereof, or offer courses of instruction or credits purporting to lead to any such degree, unless the person, partnership, corporation, company, society, or association is a state college or university; a private college or university that is authorized pursuant to this article 2; a private occupational school; a seminary or religious training institution that is authorized pursuant to this article 2; or a school, college, or university that offers courses of instruction or study in compliance with standards prescribed by part 1 of article 255 of title 12 and articles 100, 120, 215, 220, 240, 245, 275, 280, 285, 290, and 315 of title 12.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 1043, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-21-3.

L. 76:

Entire section amended, p. 414, § 10, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 424, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 78:

Entire section amended, p. 314, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1085, § 3, effective May 27.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 575, § 9, effective April 22.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 568, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1912, § 23, effective June 1.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1155), ch. 255, p. 1284, § 11, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1683, § 118, effective October 1.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (HB 20-1183), ch. 157, p. 701, § 53, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For authority of corporations existing for educational purposes to award degrees, see § 7-50-105.

23-2-103.1. Commission - department - duties - limitation - reciprocity.

The commission shall:

Establish procedures for authorizing, reauthorizing, and revoking the authorization of private colleges and universities and seminaries and religious training institutions in accordance with the provisions of this article, including but not limited to procedures by which an institution may apply for authorization or reauthorization and the procedures the department shall follow in reviewing applications and making recommendations to the commission;

Grant or deny authorizations, renew authorizations, and revoke authorizations pursuant to sections 23-2-103.3 and 23-2-103.4;

Establish the types and amounts of fees that a private college or university or seminary or religious training institution shall pay as required in section 23-2-104.5; and

Establish policies to require private colleges and universities and seminaries and religious training institutions to submit to the department, upon request, data that is directly related to student enrollment and degree completion and, if applicable, student financial aid and educator preparation programs as described in section 23-1-121. The director of the commission and an employee of the department of higher education shall not divulge or make known in any way data for individual students or personnel, except in accordance with judicial order or as otherwise provided by law. A person who violates this subsection (1)(d) commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, and shall be removed or dismissed from public service on the grounds of malfeasance in office.

The department shall administer the provisions of this article in accordance with the provisions of this article and the policies, guidelines, and procedures adopted by the commission for the administration of this article. To administer this article, the department shall have, but need not be limited to, the following duties:

Recommending that the commission grant, deny, revoke, or renew an authorization to operate a private college or university or seminary or religious training institution;

Maintaining a list of the private colleges and universities and seminaries and religious training institutions that have authorizations on file with the department; and

Establishing and maintaining a process in accordance with section 23-2-104 for reviewing and appropriately acting on a complaint concerning a private college or university or seminary or religious training institution operating in this state, including enforcing applicable state laws if the complaint is based on a claim of deceptive trade practice.

The commission and the department are not authorized to regulate the operations of, including but not limited to the content of courses provided by, a private college or university or seminary or religious training institution except to the extent expressly set forth in this article.

The commission may negotiate and enter into interstate reciprocity agreements with other states if, in the judgment of the commission, the agreements do not obligate a private college or university or seminary or religious training institution to comply with standards or requirements that exceed the standards and requirements specified in this article and the agreements will assist in accomplishing the purposes of this article.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (HB 12-1155), ch. 255, p. 1284, § 12, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

(1)(d) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3222, § 398, effective March 1, 2022.

23-2-103.3. Authorization to operate in Colorado - renewal - definitions.

To operate in Colorado, a private college or university shall apply for and receive authorization from the commission. A private college or university shall obtain a separate authorization for each campus, branch, or site that is separately accredited. A private, nonprofit college or university shall submit with its application verification of nonprofit status, including a copy of the institution's tax-exempt certificate issued by the Colorado department of revenue.

After receiving an application, the department shall review the application to determine whether the private college or university is institutionally accredited by an institutional or programmatic accrediting body recognized by the United States department of education or is accredited by a programmatic accrediting body recognized by the Council for Higher Education Accreditation as having the ability to accredit a freestanding, single-purpose institution of construction education. The department shall not recommend and the commission shall not approve an application from a private college or university that, in the two years preceding submission of the application, has had its accreditation suspended or withdrawn or has been prohibited from operating in another state or that has substantially the same owners, governing board, or principal officers as a private college or university that, in the two years preceding submission of the application, has had its accreditation suspended or withdrawn or has been prohibited from operating in another state.

As used in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, "accredited" means that an institution is institutionally accredited by:

An institutional accrediting body recognized by the United States department of education;

A programmatic accrediting body recognized by the United States department of education, which body may institutionally accredit a freestanding, single-purpose institution; or

A programmatic accrediting body recognized by the Council for Higher Education Accreditation, which body may institutionally accredit a freestanding, single-purpose institution of construction education.

To operate in Colorado, a private college or university shall be institutionally accredited on the basis of an on-site review by an institutional or programmatic accrediting body recognized by the United States department of education or, for construction education institutions, the Council for Higher Education Accreditation; except that a private college or university may operate for an initial period without accreditation if the commission determines, in accordance with standards established by the commission, that the private college or university is likely to become accredited in a reasonable period of time or is making progress toward accreditation in accordance with the accrediting body's policies. The commission may grant a provisional authorization to a private college or university to operate for an initial period without accreditation. The private college or university shall annually renew its provisional authorization and report annually to the commission concerning the institution's progress in obtaining accreditation.

A private college or university shall immediately notify the department of any material information related to an action by the institution's accrediting body concerning the institution's accreditation status, including but not limited to reaffirmation or loss of accreditation, approval of a request for change, a campus evaluation visit, a focused visit, or approval of additional locations. In addition, the institution shall immediately notify the department if the institution's accrediting body is no longer recognized by the United States department of education or, if applicable, the Council for Higher Education Accreditation.

To operate in Colorado, a seminary or religious training institution shall apply for and receive authorization from the department and establish that it qualifies as a bona fide religious institution and as an institution of postsecondary education, as defined by rules promulgated by the commission. A seminary or religious training institution that meets the criteria and rules established by this subsection (4) is exempt from the provisions of subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section. A bona fide religious institution and an institution of postsecondary education that applies for authorization pursuant to this subsection (4) shall pay the fee established according to section 23-2-104.5.

A private college or university that has authorization from the commission pursuant to this section and maintains its accreditation shall apply to the department for reauthorization in accordance with the schedule for reaccreditation by its accrediting body or every three years, whichever is longer. A seminary or religious training institution shall apply for reauthorization every three years. A private college or university or seminary or religious training institution that seeks reauthorization shall submit an application in accordance with the procedures and policies adopted by the commission and shall pay the reauthorization fee established by the commission pursuant to section 23-2-104.5.

Nothing in this section shall preclude a seminary or religious training institution from seeking accreditation.

By January 1, 2013, the commission shall adopt procedures by which a private college or university or seminary or religious training institution may renew its authorization to operate in Colorado. To renew its authorization to operate in Colorado, a private college or university or seminary or religious training institution shall demonstrate that it continues to meet the minimum operating standards specified in this section and section 23-2-103.8, if applicable.

A private college or university that has had its accreditation reaffirmed without sanction, is in compliance with section 23-2-103.8, and is not subject to investigation pursuant to section 23-2-103.4 is presumed qualified for renewal of authorization, and the department shall recommend renewal for a period of three years or the length of the institution's accreditation, if applicable, whichever is longer.

A seminary or religious training institution that continues to meet the minimum operating standards specified in this section is presumed qualified for renewal of authorization, and the department shall recommend that the commission renew the institution's authorization for three additional years.

If a private college or university or seminary or religious training institution cannot demonstrate that it meets the minimum operating standards specified in this section or section 23-2-103.8, if applicable, the department shall recommend that the commission deny the institution's application for renewal of the authorization. If, within six months after receiving the notice of denial of the application for renewal, the institution corrects the action or condition that resulted in denial of the application for renewal, the institution may reapply for renewal of the authorization. If the institution does not correct the action or condition within the six-month period, it may submit a new application for authorization after correcting the action or condition.

If a private college or university is under a sanction from its accrediting body at the time it files an application for renewal of authorization to operate in Colorado, the department may recommend that the commission renew the institution's authorization or that the commission grant a probationary renewal of the institution's authorization. If an institution receives a probationary renewal of its authorization, the institution shall reapply for renewal of its authorization annually until the accrediting body lifts the sanction, and the institution shall annually report to the commission concerning the institution's progress in removing the sanction.

If the department recommends that the commission grant a probationary renewal of authorization or deny an application for renewal of authorization, the commission shall notify the private college or university or seminary or religious training institution concerning the recommendation, and the department and the commission shall proceed in accordance with the provisions of the "State Administrative Procedure Act", article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 1647, § 2, effective May 29.

L. 2009:

(5)(b) amended, (SB 09-292), ch. 369, p. 1966, § 70, effective August 5.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1155), ch. 255, p. 1286, § 13, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

(1)(b), (2), and (3) amended and (1)(c) added, (HB 21-1306), ch. 310, p. 1895, § 1, effective September 7.

23-2-103.4. Authorization - revocation - probationary status.

If the commission has reason to believe that a private college or university or seminary or religious training institution meets one or more of the grounds specified in subsection (2) or (3) of this section for revocation of authorization or for placing an institution on probationary status, the commission may order the department to investigate the private college or university or seminary or religious training institution and make a recommendation concerning whether to revoke the institution's authorization or to place the institution on probationary status.

To assist the department in conducting an investigation pursuant to this subsection (1), the commission may subpoena any persons, books, records, or documents pertaining to the investigation, require answers in writing, under oath, to questions the commission or the department may ask, and administer an oath or affirmation to any person in connection with the investigation. In conducting the investigation, the department may physically inspect an institution's facilities and records. A subpoena issued by the commission pursuant to this paragraph (b) is enforceable by any court of record in this state.

Based on the findings of an investigation pursuant to this subsection (1), the department shall recommend to the commission that the commission should or should not revoke the institution's authorization or place the institution on probationary status. If the department recommends revocation or probationary status, it shall identify the applicable grounds for revocation or probationary status specified in subsection (2) or (3) of this section, and the department and the commission shall proceed in accordance with the provisions of the "State Administrative Procedure Act", article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

With regard to the authorization of a private college or university, the commission may:

Revoke the private college's or university's authorization or place the institution on probationary status if the private college or university:

Fails to meet any of the minimum standards set forth in this article or in the commission's policies or rules adopted to implement this article;

Fails to substantially comply with the applicable laws or rules adopted or implemented by other state-level boards or agencies that have jurisdiction over the institution; or

Violates the federal criminal laws or the criminal laws of this state or any other state in which the institution operates;

Revoke the private college's or university's authorization if the institution loses its accreditation;

Place the private college or university on probationary status if the institution's accrediting body places the institution on probation or the equivalent; or

Revoke the private college's or university's authorization or place the private college or university on probationary status if the United States department of education or, if applicable, the Council for Higher Education Accreditation, ceases to recognize the institution's accrediting body or if the programmatic accrediting body's scope of recognition ceases to include the ability to accredit a freestanding, single-purpose institution.

The commission may revoke a seminary's or religious training institution's authorization or place the institution on probationary status if the seminary or religious training institution:

No longer meets the definition of a seminary or religious training institution specified in section 23-2-102;

Fails to meet any of the other minimum standards set forth in this article or in the commission's policies or rules adopted to implement this article; or

Violates the federal criminal laws or the criminal laws of this state or any other state in which the institution operates.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (HB 12-1155), ch. 255, p. 1289, § 14, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

(2)(d) amended, (HB 21-1306), ch. 310, p. 1896, § 2, effective September 7.

23-2-103.5. Deposit of records upon discontinuance.

If a private college or university or seminary or religious training institution ceases operating within this state, the owner of the institution or his or her designee shall deposit with the department the original or legible true copies of all educational records of the institution.

If the commission determines that the records of a private college or university or seminary or religious training institution that ceases operating within the state are in danger of being destroyed, secreted, mislaid, or otherwise made unavailable to the department, the commission may seek a court order authorizing the department to seize and take possession of the records.

The department or the attorney general may enforce the provisions of this subsection (1) by filing a request for an injunction with a court of competent jurisdiction.

The commission shall adopt policies for the implementation of this subsection (1).

A person may request, in accordance with the provisions of the "Colorado Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72 of title 24, C.R.S., a copy of a record held by the department pursuant to this section.

The department shall permanently retain any student transcripts received pursuant to this section. The department shall retain any other records received pursuant to this section for ten years following the date on which it receives or obtains the records. After the required retention period, the department shall dispose of the records in a manner that will adequately protect the privacy of personal information included in the records.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 772, § 1, effective June 6.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1478, § 18, effective May 28; entire section amended, p. 1649, § 3, effective May 29.

L. 2012:

Entire section R&RE, (HB 12-1155), ch. 255, p. 1290, § 15, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section by Senate Bill 08-018 and Senate Bill 08-167 were harmonized.

23-2-103.7. Authorized institutions - responsibilities.

A private college or university or seminary or religious training institution that is authorized pursuant to this article:

Shall not make or cause to be made any oral, written, or visual statement or representation that violates section 23-2-104 (4);

Shall annually provide to the department a copy of the institution's enrollment agreement if the institution uses an enrollment agreement;

Shall provide bona fide instruction, in accordance with the standards and criteria set by the institution's accrediting body; and

If the ownership of the institution changes, shall provide to the department, within thirty days after the change, any material information concerning the transaction that is requested by the department.

If a private college or university or seminary or religious training institution violates any of the requirements specified in subsection (1) of this section, the department may recommend to the commission that the institution's authorization be revoked or placed on probationary status.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (HB 12-1155), ch. 255, p. 1291, § 16, effective August 8.